Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,160
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish and maintain a procedure to set off against a debtor's income tax refund or state lottery prize any debt which is assigned to the Department of Health and Human Services or which any individual not eligible as a public assistance recipient is attempting to collect, which has accrued through written contract, subrogation, or court judgment and is in the form of a liquidated amount due and owing for the care, support, or maintenance of a child or for spousal support.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 71;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 84;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 797;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 199.